Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article IV, section 4, will read: new text end Sec. 4. Representatives shall be chosen for a term of two years, except to fill a vacancy. Senators shall be chosen for a term of four years, except to fill a vacancy and except there shall be an entire new election of all the senators at the first election of representatives after each new legislative apportionment provided for in this article. new text begin At the first election after a new legislative apportionment, each senator elected from an even-numbered district must serve a two-year term. At the last election before a new legislative apportionment, each senator elected from an odd-numbered district must serve a two-year term. new text end The governor shall call elections to fill vacancies in either house of the legislature. Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment shall be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to provide for staggered terms of office for state senators? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . " new text end